District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF
88 COLUMBIA, That this act may be cited as the “DC Hospitality Amendment Act
89 of 2026”.
90
91 Sec. 2. Title 25 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
2

92
93 (a) Chapter 1 is amended as follows:
94
95 (1) The table of contents for Subchapter II is amended by adding new
96 section designations to read as follows:
97 “§ 25-132. Contract Brewing License.
98 “§ 25-133. Wards 5, 7 and 8 and Downtown Pop-Up Restaurant Registration.
99 “§ 25-134. Wards 5, 7 and 8 and Downtown Class C/RB and D/RB Restaurant
100 Retailer Licenses.
101 “§ 25-135. Outdoor Activation License.”.
102 (2) Section 25-101 is amended as follows:
103 (A) A new paragraph (7A) is added to read as follows:
104 “(7A) “Art gallery” means a building or part thereof where works of art
105 such as paintings, sculpture, pottery, glass, and weaving are displayed for public
106 viewing.”.
107 (B) Paragraph (8) is repealed.
108 (C) New paragraphs (15D) and (15E) are added to read as follows:
109 “(15D) “Contract brewing agreement” means a written contractual agreement
110 between the holder of a manufacturer’s license class B or of a brew pub endorsement and
111 the holder of a contract brewing license to brew malt beverages at the Board-approved
112 location of the licensed manufacturer class B or brew pub.
113 “(15E) “Contract brewing license” means a business (a “contract brewer”) that
114 is licensed by the Board to enter into a contract brewing agreement with a manufacturer’s
115 license class B or the holder of a brew pub endorsement to brew malt beverages at the
116 Board approved location of the licensed manufacturer class B or brew pub.”.
3

117 (D) A new paragraph (20A) is added to read as follows:
118 “(20A) “Electronic Signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or
119 process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a
120 person with the intent to sign the record.”.
121 (E) Paragraph (37B) is amended by striking the phrase “under an
122 on-premises restaurant license (R), as defined in § 25-113(b),” and inserting the phrase,
123 “under an off-premises retailer’s license, as defined in § 25-112(d)(1), or an on-premises
124 retailer’s license, as defined in § 25-113(a)(1),” in its place.
125 (F) A new paragraph (38C) is added to read as follows:
126 “(38C) “Primary American source” means the manufacturer, distiller,
127 rectifier, vintner, or importer of the brand of alcoholic beverages at the time that the
128 beverage became a marketable product in the United States, or its duly authorized
129 agent.”.
130 (G) Paragraph (43)(C) is repealed.
131 (H) A new paragraph (55A) is added to read as follows:
132 “(55A) “Washington Convention and Sports Authority food and alcohol
133 business” means a retailer with commercial street frontage at a location under the
134 jurisdiction of the Washington Convention and Sports Authority that sells food and is
135 approved by the Washington Convention and Sports Authority to sell alcoholic beverages
136 for on-premises consumption.”.
137 (3) Section 25-102 is amended by adding new subsections (f) and (g) to
138 read as follows:
4

139 “(f) A licensed manufacturer, or a licensed retailer holding a brew pub, wine pub,
140 or distillery pub endorsement, may ship, export, or cause to be shipped or exported
141 outside the District any alcoholic beverage they produce or are otherwise permitted to sell
142 in closed containers as required by law so long as such action complies with the receiving
143 state’s law and federal law.
144 “(g) A licensed wholesaler or any licensed off-premises retailer may
145 ship, export, or cause to be shipped or exported outside of the District any alcoholic
146 beverage they are permitted to distribute or sell by law so long as such action complies
147 with the receiving state’s law and federal law.”.
148 (4) Section 25-104 is amended as follows:
149 (A) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “issue
150 licenses to” and insert the phrase “issue licenses, permits, or endorsements to” in its
151 place.
152 (B) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “All licenses
153 issued” and inserting the phrase “All licenses, endorsements, and permits issued” in its
154 place.
155 (C) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “A license to”
156 and inserting the phrase “A license, permit, or endorsement to” in its place.
157 (D) Subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “licenses,
158 may” and inserting the phrase “licenses, permits, and endorsements, may” in its place.
159 (5) Section 25-110 is amended as follows:
160 (A) A new subsection (a-2) is added to read as follows:
5

161 “(a-2)(1) A holder of a manufacturer’s license, class A, may collaborate with
162 another distillery, regardless of jurisdiction, to use spirits manufactured at the licensed
163 premises or the licensee’s spirit recipe to produce a new spirit at another location, owned
164 by the other distillery, that may be sold by the holder of the manufacturer’s license, class
165 A, in sealed containers for off-premises consumption.
166 “(2) The sealed container containing the spirits produced by the holder of
167 the manufacturer’s license, Class A, in collaboration with another distillery, shall contain
168 the names of both distilleries.”.
169 (B) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
170 “(e) A holder of a manufacturer’s license, class A, B, or C, may manufacture and
171 store products, including malt beverages brewed under a contract brewing agreement,
172 under its license at a second location that is not on or immediately adjacent to the
173 manufacturer’s initial licensed premises, if:
174 “(1) The licensed manufacturer obtains Board approval;
175 “(2) The second location is within 1,800 feet of the initial licensed
176 premises;
177 “(3) The second location is not open to the public; and
178 “(4) No on-premises or off-premises sales occur at the second
179 location.”.
180 (6) Section 25-111(a) is amended by striking the phrase “beverages from”
181 and inserting the phrase “beverages received from the primary American source from” in
182 its place.
183 (7) Section 25-112 is amended as follows:
6

184 (A) Subsection (a-1)(2) is repealed.
185 (B) Subsection (h) is amended to read as follows:
186 “(h)(1) A Washington Convention and Sports Authority food and alcohol business
187 may sell beer, wine, or spirits in closed containers to individuals for carry-out, or may sell
188 or deliver beer, wine, or spirits in closed containers to consumer in the District, if it
189 obtains a carry out and delivery license from the Board pursuant to §§ 25-113(a)(3)(C)
190 and 25-113.01(g). Any carry-out or delivery pursuant to this section shall include one or
191 more prepared food items.
192 “(2) Any carry-out or delivery authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) of
193 this section may take place up to 7 days a week, but only between the hours of 6:00 a.m.
194 and 1:00 a.m.”.
195 (8) Section 25-113 is amended as follows:
196 (A) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
197 (i) Paragraph (2)(B) is amended to read as follows:
198 “(B) The Board shall make a licensee’s quarterly statements
199 available to any protestant, and to any member of the public who requests it pursuant to
200 the Freedom of Information Act of 1976 (“FOIA”), effective October 21, 1986 (D.C.
201 Official Code § 2-531 et seq.), for the purpose of allowing a protestant of a license to
202 determine the gross annual receipts of a licensee. The disclosure of a quarterly statement
203 to a protestant under this subparagraph, or to a member of the public who requests it,
204 shall be subject to the disclosure exemptions set forth in section 204 of FOIA (D.C.
205 Official Code § 2-534).
206 (ii) Paragraph (3)(B)(iii) is repealed.
7

207 (iii) Paragraph (5) is amended to read as follows:
208 “(5)(A) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
209 subchapter, the holder of a class C/R retailer’s license may permit a patron to remove one
210 partially consumed bottle or other container of an alcoholic beverage for off-premises
211 consumption. The holder of a class D/R retailer’s license may permit a patron to remove
212 one partially consumed bottle or other container of wine or beer for off-premises
213 consumption.
214 “(B) A partially consumed bottle or other container of an
215 alcoholic beverage that is to be removed from the premises must be securely resealed by
216 the licensee or its employee before removal from the premises.
217 “(C) The partially consumed bottle or container shall be placed
218 in a bag or other closed container that is secured in such a manner that it is visibly
219 apparent if the closed container has been subsequently opened or tampered with, and a
220 dated receipt for the bottle or container of an alcoholic beverage shall be provided by the
221 licensee and attached to the closed container.”.
222 (B) A new subsection (c)(5) is added to read as follows:
223 “(5)(A) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the holder
224 of a class C/T retailer’s license may permit a patron to remove one partially consumed
225 bottle or other container of an alcoholic beverage for off-premises consumption. The
226 holder of a class D/T retailer’s license may permit a patron to remove one partially
227 consumed bottle or other container of wine or beer for off-premises consumption.
228 “(B) A partially consumed bottle or other container of an alcoholic
229 beverage that is to be removed from the premises must be securely resealed by the
8

230 licensee or its employee before removal from the premises.
231 “(C) The partially consumed bottle or container shall be placed in a bag or
232 other closed container that is secured in such a manner that it is visibly apparent if the
233 closed container has been subsequently opened or tampered with, and a dated receipt for
234 the bottle or container of an alcoholic beverage shall be provided by the licensee and
235 attached to the closed container.”.
236 (C) Subsection (d)(1) is amended to read as follows:
237 “(1) A nightclub license (N) shall be issued only to a nightclub.”.
238 (D) Subsection (e)(7) is amended to read as follows:
239 “(7)(A) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, a retailer class
240 C/H licensee under this section may permit a patron to remove one partially consumed
241 bottle or container of an alcoholic beverage for off-premises consumption. The holder of
242 a class D/H retailer license may permit a patron to remove one partially consumed bottle
243 or other container of beer or wine for off-premises consumption.
244 “(B) A partially consumed bottle or other container of an alcoholic
245 beverage that is to be removed from the premises shall be securely resealed by the
246 licensee or its employee before removal from the premises.
247 “(C) The partially consumed bottle or other container shall be
248 placed in a bag or other closed container that is secured in such a manner that is visibly
249 apparent if the closed container has been subsequently opened or that a person has
250 tampered with the closed container.
9

251 “(D) The licensee or its employee shall provide a dated receipt for
252 the bottle or other container, which shall be attached to the bag or other closed
253 container.”.
254 (E) Subsection (g)(4) is repealed.
255 (9) Section 25-113.01(g) is amended by striking the phrase “Convention
256 Center food and alcohol business” wherever it appears and inserting the phrase
257 "Washington Convention and Sports Authority food and alcohol business” in its place.
258 (10) Section 25-116a is amended by adding new subsections (a-1), (a-2),
259 and (a-3) to read as follows:
260 “(a-1) Notwithstanding any other restrictions in this title, the holder of a
261 manufacturer’s license class B (brewery) shall be permitted to apply for one (1) Class C
262 or D retailer’s license with a brew pub endorsement under the following conditions:
263 “(1) The proposed location is in Ward 5, Ward 7, Ward 8, or downtown,
264 as defined in this section;
265 “(2) The proposed location is constructed after the effective date of the DC
266 Hospitality Amendment Act of 2026, introduced on ______ (Bill 26-__), or renovated
267 with a certificate of occupancy issued after October 1, 2024;
268 “(3) A minimum of 250 barrels of malt beverages are brewed at the
269 licensed location with the brew pub endorsement on an annual basis; and
270 “(4) The holder of the Class C or D retailer’s license with the brew pub
271 endorsement stocks and sells malt beverages produced by other producers to the public
272 that are unaffiliated with the applicant or other entities with shared ownership of 5% or
273 more in the location where the brew pub endorsement is located.
10

274 “(a-2) After the holder of a manufacturer’s license class B (brewery) has held a
275 brew pub endorsement pursuant to subsection (a-1) of this section for 24 months, the
276 holder may apply for one additional Class C or D retailer’s license with a brew pub
277 endorsement at a location in Ward 1, 2, 3, 4, or 6, pursuant to the requirements of this
278 section and § 25-117.
279 “(a-3) For purposes of this section:
280 “(1) Ward 5, Ward 7 and Ward 8 means the election ward boundaries for
281 Ward 5, Ward 7 and Ward 8 that were in effect from January 1, 2012, through December
282 31, 2021; and
283 “(2) The term “downtown” includes the Central Business District, as well
284 as any area zoned D-2, D-3, D-4, D-5, D-6, D-7, or D-8, as defined in the District’s
285 zoning regulations.”.
286 (11) Section 25-117 is amended by adding a new subsection (e-1) to read
287 as follows:
288 “(e-1) A licensee holding a brew pub endorsement and a manufacturer’s license
289 class B (brewery) at separate locations in the District shall be permitted to transport beer
290 brewed at either the brew pub facility or brewery to the brewery or brew pub facility for
291 sale and consumption.”.
292 (12) Section 25-119 is amended by adding a new subsection (e) to read as
293 follows:
294 “(e) A licensed wholesaler may import alcoholic beverages without an import
295 permit so long as all required taxes related to the importation of the alcoholic beverages
296 being imported are paid in accordance with District laws and regulations.”.
11

297 (13) Section 25-125 is amended by adding a new subsection (j) to read as
298 follows:
299 “(j) Notwithstanding any other restrictions in this section, alcohol infused
300 confectionary food products manufactured at the establishment by the holder of a
301 distillery pub endorsement shall be permitted to be sold to another licensee licensed
302 under this title for resale”.
303 (14) Subsection 25-126(e-1) is amended to read as follows:
304 “(e-1)(1) In addition to the authorizations provided under subsections (a) and (a-
305 1) of this section, a manufacturer with an onsite sales and consumption permit may sell
306 the following products:
307 “(A) A class B brewery may sell or serve wine and spirits
308 purchased from a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler to the public;
309 “(B) A Class A winery may sell and serve beer and spirits
310 purchased from a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler to the public; and
311 “(C) A Class A distillery may sell and serve beer and wine
312 purchased from a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler to the public.
313 “(2) The holder of a manufacturer’s license class A or B that holds an on-
314 site sales and consumption permit may sell or serve beer, wine, and spirits purchased
315 from a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler at private events not open to the public for
316 on-premises consumption.”.
317 (15) Section 25-129(b) is amended by striking the phrase “suspended or”.
318 (16) Section 25-131 is amended as follows:
319 (A) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase "lifestyle
12

320 center.” and inserting the phrase “lifestyle center, Arena C/X licensee, or Washington
321 Convention and Sports Authority food and alcohol business that hosts sporting events.”
322 in its place.
323 (B) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “a private
324 club,” and inserting the phrase " an Arena C/X licensee, or a Washington Convention and
325 Sports Authority food and alcohol business that hosts sporting events,” in its place.
326 (3) A new subsection (c-1) is added to read as follows:
327 “(c-1) An Arena C/X licensee or a Washington Convention and Sports
328 Authority food and alcohol business that hosts sporting events may request Board
329 approval to allow the sale, service, and consumption of beer, wine, or spirits on outdoor
330 public space for a specific event that involves a street closure.”.
331 (17) New sections 25-132, 25-133, 25-134, and 25-135 are added to read
332 as follows:
333 “25-132. Contract Brewing License.
334 “(a) A contract brewing license shall be valid for 3 years and authorize the
335 licensee (the “contract brewer”) to enter into a written contract brewing agreement with
336 the holder of a manufacturer’s license, class B, or a brew pub endorsement to brew malt
337 beverages at the Board-approved location of the licensed class B manufacturer or brew
338 pub.
339 “(b) A contract brewing license shall authorize the contract brewer to sell and
340 deliver malt beverages brewed at the Board-approved location to licensed wholesalers
341 and a dealer licensed under the laws of any state or territory of the United States for
342 resale. The contract brewer may also sell and deliver up to 15,500 gallons of malt
13

343 beverages brewed at the Board-approved location annually to other retail licensees for
344 resale purposes.
345 “(c) A contract brewer may sell and deliver malt beverages for off-premises
346 consumption from the Board-approved brewing location.
347 “(d) A contract brewer may sell malt beverages for on-premises consumption at
348 the brew pub or manufacturer’s license, class B, location where the malt beverages were
349 brewed.
350 “(e) A written contract brewing agreement between a contract brewer and the
351 holder of a manufacturer’s license, class B, or a brew pub endorsement may also include
352 terms allowing the sale of malt beverages brewed at the Board-approved location for on-
353 premises and off-premises consumption.
354 “(f) The following restrictions shall apply to a contract brewing license:
355 “(1) The contract brewer shall retain title to the malt beverages brewed at
356 the Board-approved location and shall be the ultimate seller of the product;
357 “(2) The parties to the written contract brewing agreement shall maintain,
358 for a period of 3 years, complete and accurate records of the list and quantities of malt
359 beverages brewed at the Board-approved location and sales of the respective products;
360 and
361 “(3) The contract brewer shall only sell malt beverages to a consumer
362 under the following conditions:
363 “(A) Malt beverages shall only be sold for off-premises
364 consumption,
14

365 “(B) Malt beverages shall be sold in barrels, kegs, cans, including
366 crowlers, and sealed bottles, including growlers, and
367 “(C) Purchased malt beverages shall not be opened after sale, or
368 the contents consumed, on the premises where sold.”.
369 “25-133. Wards 5, 7 and 8 and Downtown Pop-Up Restaurant Registration.
370 “(a) An applicant or an eligible retailer shall be permitted to
371 register with the Board to open up a pop-up restaurant in Ward 5, Ward 7, Ward 8, or
372 downtown, as defined in this section. For the purposes of this section, the term “eligible
373 retailer” means a licensed on-premises retailer, a class B full-service grocery store, or a
374 class A 25% grocery store.
375 “(b) An applicant or an eligible retailer that registers with the Board may sell and
376 serve alcoholic beverages for both on-premises and off-premises consumption.
377 “(c) A registered applicant or registered eligible retailer operating a pop-up
378 restaurant pursuant to this section may sell beer and wine in closed containers for off-
379 premises consumption without being accompanied by one or more prepared food items.
380 A registered new applicant or an eligible retailer may sell spirits for off-premises
381 consumption in closed containers accompanied by one or more prepared food items.
382 “(d) An applicant or an eligible retailer seeking to register as a pop-up restaurant
383 pursuant to this section shall be required to submit a menu with food items to be offered,
384 excluding snack items, with its registration application.
385 “(e) A registered applicant, or a registered eligible retailer, that seeks to register as
386 a pop-up restaurant pursuant to this section, shall have adequate kitchen and dining
387 facilities and keep its kitchen facilities open, have a menu in use, and be ready, willing,
15

388 and able to prepare and serve food, other than just snack items, until at least 2 hours
389 before closing. For purposes of this subsection, “snack items” includes potato chips,
390 popcorn, pretzels, crackers, nuts, cookies, and candy.
391 “(f) The Board shall fine, suspend, cancel, or revoke the pop-up restaurant
392 registration of an applicant, after a hearing, that is not in compliance with the
393 requirements of this section. The Board shall give the registered applicant a minimum of
394 five (5) calendar days’ notice prior to holding a hearing and rendering a decision, as
395 permitted by the subsection.
396 “(g) A registration application for a pop-up restaurant in Ward 5, Ward 7, Ward 8,
397 or downtown shall not be required to follow the restrictions set forth in §§ 25-314(b)(1)
398 and 25-333.
399 “(h) An applicant or eligible retailer shall not apply for or operate more than three
400 pop-up restaurants under this section at one time.
401 “(i) Board approval of the pop-up restaurant registration, beyond the approval
402 described in this section, shall not be required provided that:
403 “(1) The applicant’s proposed location possesses a valid certificate of
404 occupancy issued to either the prior tenant, building owner, or the applicant, unless the
405 proposed location is only on outdoor private space;
406 “(2) The applicant has been authorized by the owner of the building or the
407 property to utilize the space as a restaurant;
408 “(3) The applicant’s proposed location is located in a commercial or
409 mixed-use zone as defined in the zoning regulations for the District; and
16

410 “(4) The applicant agrees to follow all applicable Department of Licensing
411 and Consumer Protection and Department of Health laws and regulations.
412 “(j) The permitted hours of indoor operation for a pop-up restaurant shall be 6
413 a.m. to 1 a.m., 7 days a week. A pop-up restaurant registrant may offer indoor
414 entertainment, which may include a cover charge, between the hours of 8 a.m. and
415 midnight, 7 days a week.
416 “(k) The permitted hours of off-premises alcohol sales at the pop-up restaurant,
417 including carry out and delivery shall be 6 a.m. to 1 a.m., 7 days a week.
418 “(l) A pop-up restaurant registrant may operate under this section for no longer
419 than 90 calendar days. The Board may approve a written request from a pop-up
420 restaurant registrant to extend its operations for one additional 30 calendar day period. A
421 pop-up restaurant registrant shall not operate for more than 120 days unless a completed
422 application for a license pursuant to § 25-134 has been filed with the Board with notice
423 provided to the public in accordance with § 25-421.
424 “(m) The terms of a settlement agreement that an eligible retailer has in effect at
425 its current licensed location shall not follow the licensee to its additional proposed pop-up
426 restaurant registration location.
427 “(n) For purposes of this section:
428 “(1) Ward 5, Ward 7 and Ward 8 means the election ward boundaries for
429 Ward 5, Ward 7 and Ward 8 that were in effect from January 1, 2012, through December
430 31, 2021; and
17

431 “(2) The term “downtown” includes the Central Business District, as well as
432 any area zoned D-2, D-3, D-4, D-5, D-6, D-7, or D-8, as defined in the District’s zoning
433 regulations.
434 “25-134. Wards 5, 7 and 8 and Downtown Class C/RB and D/RB Restaurant
435 Retailer Licenses.
436 “(a) An applicant with a proposed location in Ward 5, Ward 7, Ward 8, or
437 downtown, as defined in this section, shall be eligible to apply for a class C/RB or class
438 D/RB restaurant retailer’s license. A class C/RB or class D/RB restaurant retailer’s
439 license shall be a type of restaurant license pursuant to § 25-113(b), and shall authorize
440 the holder to operate both a restaurant and a wine and beer store with on-premises and
441 off-premises alcohol sales at the same location.
442 “(b) A class C/RB restaurant retailer’s license shall authorize the holder to sell
443 and serve spirits, wine, and beer for on-premises consumption and sell and deliver wine
444 and beer in either sealed or closed containers for off-premises consumption without being
445 accompanied by a prepared food item. The holder of a class C/RB restaurant retailer’s
446 license may obtain a carry out and delivery endorsement to sell spirits for carry out and
447 delivery in closed containers accompanied by one or more prepared food items for off-
448 premises consumption.
449 “(c) A class D/RB restaurant retailer’s license shall authorize the holder to sell
450 and serve beer and wine for on-premises consumption and sell and deliver wine and beer
451 in either sealed or closed containers for off-premises consumption without being
452 accompanied by a prepared food item.
453 “(d) An applicant for a class C/RB or class D/RB restaurant retailer’s license shall
18

454 be required to undergo a 45-day public comment period with notice provided to the
455 public in accordance with the requirements set forth in § 25-421.
456 “(e) The holder of a class C/RB or class D/RB restaurant retailer’s license shall
457 comply with the statutory restaurant requirements set forth in §§ 25-101(43) and 25-
458 113(b).
459 “(f) An applicant for a class C/RB or class D/RB restaurant license for a location
460 in Ward 5, Ward 7, Ward 8, or downtown shall be exempt from the restrictions set forth
461 in §§ 25-314(b)(1) and 25-333.
462 “(g) After 24 months of operation in Ward 5, Ward 7 or Ward 8, the holder of a
463 class C/RB or class D/RB restaurant retailer’s license shall be permitted to apply for one
464 additional class C/RB or class D/RB restaurant retailer’s license at a location in Wards 1
465 through 4 and 6.
466 “(h) A class C/RB or class D/RB restaurant retailer’s license shall be valid for 3
467 years.
468 “(i) For purposes of this section:
469 “(1) Ward 5, Ward 7 and Ward 8 means the election ward boundaries for
470 Ward 5, Ward 7 and Ward 8 that were in effect from January 1, 2012, through December
471 31, 2021; and
472 “(2) The term “downtown” includes the Central Business District, as well as
473 any area zoned D-2, D-3, D-4, D-5, D-6, D-7, or D-8, as defined in the District’s zoning
474 regulations.
475 “25-135. Outdoor Activation License.
19

476 “(a) An outdoor activation license shall authorize a BID corporation to sell, serve,
477 and permit the consumption of alcoholic beverages at an outdoor space named on the
478 license that is owned, controlled, or managed by the District.
479 “(b) An outdoor activation license shall be issued for a period of one year. A BID
480 corporation may request in writing that the Board renew the license for an additional
481 year, subject to the payment of an annual fee.
482 “(c) The issuance of an outdoor activation license shall be based upon the
483 applicant’s compliance with § 25-301.
484 “(d) The Board may deny the renewal of an outdoor activation license application
485 if the applicant has failed to control the environment during the previous year or has
486 sustained police action or substantiated community complaints.
487 “(e) There shall be 2 classes of outdoor activation licenses:
488 “(1) Class O (beer and wine); and
489 “(2) Class N (spirits, beer, and wine).
490 “(f) The annual fee for a Class O license shall be $130. The
491 annual fee for a Class N license shall be $300.”.
492 (b) Chapter 2 is amended as follows:
493 (1) Section 25-201 is amended as follows:
494 (A) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
495 (i) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “title;”
496 and inserting the phrase, “title, where appropriate;” in its place.
497 (ii) Paragraph (8) is amended to read as follows:
498 “(8) Refer evidence of criminal misconduct or other violations of law to
20

499 the Inspector General of the District of Columbia, the Attorney General for the District of
500 Columbia, the United States Attorney for the District, an appropriate District agency, or
501 other law enforcement agency for investigation and prosecution.”.
502 (2) Section 25-206 is amended as follows:
503 (A) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “licensed
504 establishments” and inserting the phrase “licensed alcohol establishments and medical
505 cannabis facilities” in its place.
506 (B) Subsection (f)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “alcoholic
507 beverages in” and inserting the phrase “alcoholic beverages and medical cannabis in” in
508 its place.
509 (C) Subsection (g) is amended as follows:
510 (i) Strike the phrase “alcoholic beverages, or” and insert the
511 phrase “alcoholic beverages or medical cannabis, or” in its place.
512 (ii) Strike the phrase “alcoholic beverages;” and insert the
513 phrase “alcoholic beverages or medical cannabis;” in its place.
514 (3) Section 25-211 is amended as follows:
515 (A) Subsection (a) is repealed.
516 (B) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
517 “(b)(1) The Mayor shall submit proposed regulations to the Council for a
518 60-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess.
519 “(2) The Council may approve the proposed regulations in whole or in
520 part. If the Council has not approved the regulations upon expiration of the 60-day
521 review period, the regulations shall be deemed approved.”.
21

522 (c) Chapter 3 is amended as follows:
523 (1) Section 25-301 is amended as follows:
524 (A) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
525 (i) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
526 “(3)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the
527 applicant has not been convicted of a felony for a crime of violence, a gun offense, tax
528 evasion, fraud, as defined in § 22-3221, or credit card fraud within the 3 years preceding
529 the date the application is filed with ABCA;
530 “(B) A applicant for a solicitor’s license or manager’s license has
531 not been convicted of a felony for a crime of violence, a gun offense, tax evasion, fraud,
532 or credit card fraud within the 3 years preceding the date the application is filed with
533 ABCA.
534 (ii) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
535 (B) Subsection (c-1) is amended by striking the phrase “within 5
536 years” and inserting the phrase “for a crime of violence, a gun offense, tax evasion, fraud,
537 or credit card fraud within 3 years” in its place.
538 (2) Section 25-303(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs (6) and (7) to
539 read as follows:
540 “(6) Notwithstanding any other provisions in this subsection, the holder of
541 a retailer’s license class C or Class D, a full-service grocery store class B, or a 25%
542 grocery store class A may hold one or more class C/RB or class D/RB restaurant retailer
543 licenses, as permitted by this title.
22

544 “(7) Notwithstanding the restrictions set forth in subsection (a)(1A) of this
545 section, the holder of a manufacturer’s license, class B, may apply for a class C or class D
546 retailer’s license with a brew pub endorsement subject to the requirements of § 25-
547 116a.”.
548 (3) Section 25-314 is amended as follows:
549 (A) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
550 (i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase
551 “through (11)” and inserting the phrase “through (12)” in its place.
552 (ii) A new paragraph (12) is amended to read as follows:
553 “(12) Pursuant to § 25-134(f), the 400-foot restriction shall not apply to
554 the holder of a class C/RB or class D/RB restaurant license for a location in Ward 5,
555 Ward 7, Ward 8, or downtown as defined in this title.”.
556 (B) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
557 “(d) In determining the appropriateness of an establishment for initial issuance of
558 a license or a transfer of a license to a new location, the Board shall not consider any
559 restrictive land covenant, deed, or other use restriction of any type, excluding a property’s
560 zoning designation, that bans, restricts, or in any way prohibits the placement and use of
561 an alcoholic beverage license at an applicant’s proposed location. Nothing in this
562 subsection shall prohibit a protest of an application for the initial issuance of a license or
563 the transfer of a license to a new location from being filed pursuant to the requirements
564 set forth in chapter 4 of this title.”.
565 (4) Section 25-315(b) is amended as follows:
23

566 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the period at the end of
567 the sentence and inserting the phrase “or Board Order.” In its place.
568 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
569 “(2) The Board shall make the licensee’s investigative history, which shall
570 consist of the licensee’s record of alcoholic beverage violations, available to
571 the public for review.”.
572 (5) Section 25-331(a) is amended by striking the word “250” and inserting
573 the word “275” in its place.
574 (6) Section 25-332(e) is amended by striking the phrase, “class B, for the
575 sale of alcoholic beverages in an establishment if the;” and inserting the phrase “class B,
576 located inside of a hotel, for the sale of alcoholic beverages in an establishment if the:” in
577 its place.
578 (7) Section 25-336(g)(1) is amended by striking the phrase, “Board of
579 Zoning” and inserting the phrase “Board of Zoning Adjustment” in its place.
580 (8) Section 25-351 is amended by adding a new subsection (h) to read as
581 follows:
582 “(h) The Board may adopt emergency rules to extend the expiration date of an
583 existing moratorium to allow an ANC where the moratorium is located to consider or
584 vote on a moratorium petition or resolution at a noticed ANC meeting.”.
585 (d) Chapter 4 is amended as follows:
586 (1) The table of contents is amended by adding new section designations
587 to read as follows:
588 “§ 25-446.03 Unenforceable Agreements Generally.”
24

589 “§ 25-446.04 ANC Redistricting and Successor ANC.”.
590 (2) Section 25-434 is amended by adding a new subsection (c) to read as
591 follows:
592 “(c) If an applicant or protestant is convicted of violating subsection (a) of this
593 section, after final entry of judgment of conviction the Board may:
594 “(1) Dismiss the individual protestant or deny the license application; or
595 “(2) Bar the applicant or protestant, for up to 5 years, from protesting or
596 filing a license application.”.
597 (3) Section 25-441(a) is amended by striking the phrase “for good cause.”
598 And inserting the phrase “for good cause, by the Board sua sponte, or by a motion filed
599 by any party.” in its place.
600 (4) Section 25-443(c) is amended by striking the phrase “The Board” and
601 inserting the phrase “The party seeking the subpoena” in its place.
602 (5) Section 25-446 is amended to read as follows:
603 “§ 25-446. Settlement agreements; approval process; penalties for violations.
604 “(a) The applicant, any protestant, and any person or entity who would otherwise
605 have standing to protest an application pursuant to § 25-601 may, at any time, negotiate a
606 settlement and enter into a written settlement agreement setting forth the terms of the
607 settlement.
608 “(b)(1) The signatories to the agreement shall submit the agreement to the Board
609 for approval.
610 “(2) Except as provided in § 25-446.02, all provisions of a settlement
611 agreement approved by the Board shall be enforceable by ABCA or the Board.
25

612 “(c) If it determines that the settlement agreement complies with all applicable
613 laws and regulations and the applicant otherwise qualifies for licensure, the Board, in its
614 discretion, may condition its approval of the license application upon the licensee’s
615 compliance with the terms of the agreement. The Board shall incorporate the text of the
616 settlement agreement in its order and the settlement agreement shall be enforceable by
617 the Board.
618 “(c-1) The Board shall reject any settlement agreement that is not in accordance
619 with the law and may reject any settlement agreement that requires compliance with
620 statutory or regulatory requirements enforced by another agency.
621 “(d)(1) Unless a shorter term is agreed upon by the parties, a settlement agreement
622 approved by the Board shall run for the term of a license, including renewal periods,
623 unless it is terminated or amended in writing by the parties and the termination or
624 amendment is approved by the Board.
625 “(2) The Board may accept an application to amend or terminate a
626 settlement agreement by fewer than all parties in the following circumstances:
627 “(A) During the licensee’s renewal period; and
628 “(B) After 4 years from the date of the Board’s decision initially
629 approving the settlement agreement.
630 “(3) Notice of an application to amend or terminate a settlement
631 agreement shall be given both to the parties of the agreement and to the public at the time
632 of the applicant’s renewal application according to the renewal procedures required under
633 §§ 25-421 through 25-423.
26

634 “(4) The Board may approve a request by fewer than all parties to amend
635 or terminate a settlement agreement for good cause shown if it makes each of the
636 following findings based upon sworn evidence:
637 “(A)(i) The applicant seeking the amendment or termination has
638 made a diligent effort to locate all other parties to the settlement agreement; or
639 “(ii) If non-applicant parties are located, the applicant has
640 made a good faith attempt to negotiate a mutually acceptable amendment or termination
641 of the settlement agreement;
642 “(B) The need for an amendment or termination is either caused by
643 circumstances beyond the control of the applicant or is due to a change in the
644 neighborhood where the applicant’s establishment is located; and
645 “(C) The amendment or termination will not have an adverse
646 impact on the neighborhood where the establishment is located as determined under §§
647 25-313 or 25-314, if applicable.
648 “(5) To fulfill the good faith attempt criteria of paragraph (4)(A)(ii) of this
649 subsection, a sworn affidavit from the applicant shall be filed with the Board at the time
650 that an application to amend or terminate a settlement agreement by fewer than all parties
651 is filed stating that either:
652 “(A) A meeting occurred between the parties which did not result
653 in an agreement; or
654 “(B) The non-applicant parties refused to meet with the applicant.
655 “(6) For the purposes of this subsection, the term “license’s renewal
656 period” means the 60-day period before the expiration date of a license.
27

657 “(7) Upon the filing of a valid petition for termination or amendment by
658 the applicant under this section, and the subsequent petition of the applicant that any
659 signatory party has not filed a valid protest during the public comment period, that
660 signatory party shall automatically be removed from the agreement.
661 “(e) If the Board determines, following a show-cause hearing as provided in § 25-
662 447, that a licensee has violated a settlement agreement, the Board may penalize the
663 licensee according to the provisions set forth for violations of a license in Chapter 8 of
664 this title.
665 “(f) A settlement agreement shall automatically terminate if the Board finds, upon
666 petition of the applicant, that the Board has approved a transfer of the license to a new
667 location at least 1,200 feet away from the prior location after the approval of the
668 agreement.”.
669 (6) Section 25-446.01 is amended to read as follows:
670 “§ 25-446.01. Settlement agreements – Enforceable provisions
671 A settlement agreement enforceable by the Board under this subchapter may
672 include provisions that:
673 “(a) Allow or prohibit amplified or recorded music or other amplified sounds and
674 live entertainment; set maximum decibel limits on sound amplification devices; or restrict
675 the location of entertainment and use of sound equipment or the hours that amplified or
676 recorded music, amplified sound, or live entertainment that may be provided;
677 “(b) Require specific methods, including specific architectural features, to
678 mitigate sound or noise disturbances, such as: requiring doors and windows to remain
679 closed except for the case of ingress and egress; requiring sound barriers and other sound
28

680 proofing elements; requiring the use of sound limiters and other equipment; and
681 restricting the placement of sound equipment;
682 “(c) Require cleanliness, litter and trash control inside of and in the immediate
683 area surrounding the premises by, for example, specifying the frequency with which the
684 immediate area is cleaned, specifying trash removal times, requiring efforts to limit rat
685 and vermin infestation, and requiring trash and recycling management;
686 “(d) Require specific parking arrangements;
687 “(e) Require the use of valet parking through a valet service, but only through a
688 service that is properly approved and has all licenses, permits, and other approvals
689 required by law;
690 “(f) Require that the applicant or existing licensee maintain an incident log and
691 that the incident log be made available to ABCA and the Board, upon request;
692 “(g) Require filing and compliance with a security plan in accordance with this
693 title, to the extent that the Board is authorized to require the filing of a security plan in
694 accordance with this title;
695 “(h) Contain notice to cure provisions;
696 “(i) Restrict the hours of operation, alcohol consumption, alcohol sales, alcohol
697 service, or alcohol possession, outdoor facilities, and entertainment on the premises or
698 specific parts of the premises;
699 “(j) Prohibit or restrict the utilization of floors, prohibit or restrict the utilization
700 of outdoor areas, or limit the occupancy and the number of seats;
701 “(k) Address the prevention of intoxication, public intoxication, public urination,
702 public defecation, and underage drinking by patrons;
29

703 “(l) Require the use of security cameras, minimum identification checking
704 procedures, minimum security personnel staffing, crowd control measures, the use of
705 various doors as exits and entrances, the hiring of the Metropolitan Police Department
706 (MPD) Reimbursable Detail, restricting the consumption of alcohol by the owners or its
707 agents at the premises, and other security policies and procedures;
708 “(m) Require minimum training for managers and staff;
709 “(n) Require the postage of signage or information on the establishment’s
710 website;
711 “(o) Provide minimum kitchen hours, require the service or availability of food
712 and non-alcoholic beverages, and restrictions on the location of alcohol consumption and
713 service on the premises;
714 “(p) Require the sale or service of alcohol in tempered glass, paper, plastic or
715 other soft materials, otherwise designed to break without sharp edges; and
716 “(q) Mandate that the establishment comply with existing District law and all
717 licenses, endorsements, and permits, granted by the District.”.
718 (7) Section 25-446.02 is amended to read as follows:
719 “§ 25-446.02 Settlement agreements – Unenforceable provisions.
720 The Board shall not enforce, if included in a settlement agreement covered by this
721 subchapter, provisions that:
722 “(a) Require approval from a signatory or third party to file an application or
723 request with the Board;
724 “(b) Require additional or specific notice to a signatory or third party outside of
725 the notice required by law;
30

726 “(c) Restrict the sale or transfer of the business to new or different owners or
727 require or restrict a change in the class or type of license;
728 “(d) Prohibit the act of filing an application or a request with the District;
729 “(e) Mandate the purchase, service, or sale of specific types of food, non-
730 alcoholic beverages, and alcoholic beverages, the type of cuisine, the use of brands or
731 types of alcohol and other products, and alcohol pricing;
732 “(f) Restrict customers based upon age, gender, national origin, status as a
733 student, or other criteria prohibited by the Human Rights Act of 1977, effective
734 December 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 2-38; D.C. Official Code § 2-1401.01 et. seq.);
735 “(g) Require the use of specific businesses, or the hiring of specific persons or
736 categories of persons;
737 “(h) Create additional administrative procedures in addition to those required by
738 ABCA or the District;
739 “(i) Require licensee or their agents to attend ANC or community meetings or
740 otherwise require them to appear or communicate with the signatories or third parties;
741 “(j) Require the establishment to provide money, buy specific goods or services,
742 or provide financial or other benefits to the community; provide the payment of fees or
743 restitution to lawyers, consultants, and other third parties; or provide discounts, free
744 goods and services, or other promotions to the community;
745 “(k) Require that contracts, incident logs, or similar documents be made available
746 to the signatories or third parties;
747 “(l) Require a minimum level of food, non-alcoholic beverage, or alcoholic
748 beverage sales to the public; and
31

749 “(m) Require future negotiation or create probationary periods that alter the terms
750 of the license, settlement agreement, or the operation of the establishment after approval
751 of the agreement.”.
752 (8) A new section 25-446.03 is added to read as follows:
753 “§ 25-446.03. Unenforceable Agreements Generally.
754 “(a) A settlement agreement not approved by the Board shall not be
755 enforced by ABCA or the Board.
756 “(b) Any promise by a person, in a contract, settlement agreement, or
757 other agreement, not to exercise that person’s rights to object to, or petition against, a
758 license application or to withdraw a filed objection shall be void if made in exchange for
759 money or other compensation to any individual or entity.”.
760 (9) A new section 25-446.04 is added to read as follows:
761 “§ 25.446.04. ANC Redistricting and Successor ANC.
762 “After the approval of a settlement agreement between the licensee and an ANC
763 or the filing of a protest by that ANC, if the Council amends the boundaries of ANCs and
764 the licensed establishment is located in a new ANC’s boundaries, the new ANC shall be
765 deemed the successor-in-interest and replace the original ANC as a party to the
766 agreement and any filed protest.”.
767 (e) Chapter 5 is amended as follows:
768 (1) The table of contents is amended by adding the following section
769 designations:
770 “§ 25-514. Minimum fees for contract brewing license.”
771 “§25-515. Wards 5, 7 and 8 Downtown Pop-Up Restaurant Registration”
32

772 “§25-516. Minimum fees for Class CRB and DRB licenses.”
773 “§25-517. Minimum fees for Art Galleries for Multipurpose Facility Licenses.”.
774 (2) Section 25-501(c) is amended to read as follows:
775 “(c)(1) A licensee’s failure to timely remit the annual fee shall be cause
776 for the Board to suspend the license until the licensee pays the fee and any additional fees
777 imposed by the Board for late payment. The licensee shall have 14 calendar days to
778 respond to the Board’s order suspending its license. If the licensee fails to respond or
779 demonstrate good cause why the fees and additional fees have not been remitted, the
780 Board shall cancel the license.
781 “(2) A license that has been suspended by the Board for the non-payment
782 of license fees and additional fees shall automatically be reinstated by ABCA once all of
783 the imposed fees have been paid.
784 (3) Section 25-502 is amended as follows:
785 (A) The heading is amended by striking the phrase “license fees” and
786 inserting the phrase “license, permit, and endorsement” in its place.
787 (B) Strike the phrase “license fees established by this chapter or to create
788 additional license” and insert the phrase “license, permit, or endorsement fees established
789 by this chapter or to create additional license, permit, or endorsement” in its place.
790 (4) New sections 25-514, 25-515, 25-516, and 25-517 are added to read as
791 follows:
792 “§ 25-514. Minimum fees for contract brewing license.
793 “The minimum application fee for a contract brewing license shall be $300. The
794 minimum annual fee for a contract brewing license shall be $500.”.
33

795 “§ 25-515. Wards 7 and 8 and Downtown Pop-Up Restaurant
796 Registration.
797 “The minimum fee for a Wards 7 and 8 and Downtown Pop-up Restaurant
798 registration shall be $300.
799 “§ 25-516. Minimum fees for Class C/RB and Class D/RB licenses.
800 “The Board shall establish the minimum annual fees for the Class C/RB and Class
801 D/RB retailer license categories by regulation based upon the capacity of the restaurant.
802 “§ 25-517. Minimum fees for Art Galleries for Multipurpose Facility
803 Licenses.
804 “If an art gallery or bookstore applies for a new multipurpose facility retailer’s
805 license Class C/X or D/X for a proposed location in Ward 5, Ward 7, Ward 8, or
806 downtown, the art gallery or bookstore shall not be required to pay an application fee and
807 shall not be required to pay a licensing fee for its initial license or for its first two
808 subsequent annual license periods. For purposes of this section:
809 “(a) Ward 5, Ward 7 and Ward 8 means the election ward boundaries for Ward 7
810 and Ward 8 that were in effect from January 1, 2012, through December 31, 2021; and
811 “(b) The term “downtown” includes the Central Business District, as well as any
812 area zoned D-2, D-3, D-4, D-5, D-6, D-7, or D-8, as defined in the District’s zoning
813 regulations.
814 (f) Chapter 6 is amended as follows:
815 (1) Section 25-601 is amended by adding a new subsection (c) to read as
816 follows:
817 “(c) If the boundaries of an ANC are redrawn in a manner that an
34

818 applicant is located in the boundaries of a new ANC, the new ANC, upon the filing of a
819 written request for standing with the Board, shall be entitled to standing as a party and
820 participate as a protestant in any pending protest active on the date the applicant’s
821 existing or proposed location was officially located within the new ANC’s boundaries
822 unless the protest is resolved before the filing of the ANC’s motion for standing.”.
823 (g) Chapter 7 is amended as follows:
824 (1) The table of contents is amended by adding the following section
825 designation:
826 “§ 25-741. Go-cups prohibited.”.
827 (2) Section 25-722 is amended as follows:
828 (A) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
829 “(a) A licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license, class A or
830 B, may sell and deliver alcoholic beverages to District residents, or provide alcoholic
831 beverages to customers by curbside delivery, only between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and
832 1:00 a.m., 7 days a week.
833 (B) Subsection (b) is repealed.
834 (3) Section 25-723 is amended as follows:
835 (A) Subsection (c)(1) is amended as follows:
836 (i) Subparagraph (E) is amended as follows:
837 (I) Strike the phrase "Christmas Day,” and insert the
838 phrase “Christmas Day, Juneteenth National Independence Day, and” in its place.
839 (4) Section 25-731(b) is amended by striking the phrase “purchase or
35

840 delivery” and inserting the phrase “purchase or delivery unless the 16th day falls on a
841 weekend or public holiday, in which case payment shall be made on the next calendar
842 day that does not fall on a weekend or public holiday” in its place.
843 (5) Section 25-736(a-1) is amended to read as follows:
844 “(a-1)(1) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, with the
845 Board’s prior approval, a licensed wholesaler may rent a retailer’s licensed premises for
846 more than $500 to host a one-day or a one-time event.
847 “(2) The Board shall not grant a wholesaler’s request pursuant to
848 paragraph (1) of this subsection more than one time in a calendar year.”.
849 (6) Section 25-762(b)(17) is repealed.
850 (7) Section 25-784 is amended to read as follows:
851 “§ 25-784. Sale or distribution of beverages by minor prohibited.
852 “(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a licensee shall
853 not allow any person under 21 years of age to sell, give, furnish, or distribute an alcoholic
854 beverage.
855 “(b) A licensee may allow an employee who is 18 years of age or older to sell,
856 serve, deliver, or pour an alcoholic beverage; provided, that no employee under 21 years
857 of age shall serve as a bartender.
858 “(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), a licensed on-premises retailer class
859 C/R, D/R, C/H, D/H, C/T, or D/T may allow an individual who is 17 years of age to sell
860 or serve alcoholic beverages, except to patrons seated or standing at a bar, if both of the
861 following conditions are met:
36

862 “(1) The individual has completed an alcohol training and education
863 certification program from a Board-approved provider as set forth in § 25-121; and
864 “(2) During the individual’s shift, the retailer has a licensed manager or
865 owner on-duty who is 21 years of age or older and has completed an alcohol training and
866 education certification program from a Board-approved provider.”.
867 (h) Chapter 8 is amended as follows:
868 (1) The table of contents is amended to add a new section designation
869 under Subchapter II to read as follows:
870 “§ 25-829a. Cease and desist orders for catering sites”.
871 (2) Section 25-826(c) is amended by striking the phrase “request a hearing
872 within” and inserting the phrase “request a hearing in writing within” in its place.
873 (3) A new section 25-829a is added to read as follows:
874 “§ 25-829a. Cease and desist orders for catering sites.
875 “(a) If the Board, after investigation but before a hearing, has cause to believe that
876 a licensed caterer is engaged in a use or activity not permitted by its caterer’s license at
877 an event site that is causing immediate harm to the public, the Board may issue an order
878 requiring the caterer to cease using the property for catered events or under such
879 restrictions as the Board may impose in accordance with § 25-104(e).
880 “(b) The order shall be served on the caterer, either by certified mail or delivery in
881 person.
882 “(c) The caterer may, within 15 calendar days after the service of the order,
883 submit a written request to the Board to hold a hearing on the alleged violation.
37

884 “(d) Upon receipt of a timely request, the Board shall conduct an expedited
885 hearing within 10 days after the date of receiving the request.
886 “(e) The Board may prohibit the licensed caterer from utilizing its license at a
887 specific property for catered events if it finds any of the following after reviewing the
888 investigative report:
889 “(1) The caterer engaged in a primary tier violation at the event site;
890 “(2) At the time of the event, the premises or event were in violation of the
891 Building Code or the Fire Code; or
892 “(3) One or more catered events at the location had a negative impact
893 upon the peace, order, and quiet of the section of the neighborhood, as defined in § 25-
894 101(46), where the event was held if it is shown that:
895 “(A) The caterer produced amplified noise at the catered event that
896 was heard in a dwelling between 10:00 p.m. and 7:00 a.m.;
897 “(B) The caterer permitted the event site to exceed the maximum
898 occupancy permitted by the premise’s certificate of occupancy; or
899 “(C) During the event, a crime of violence or other felony occurred
900 or a weapon was used or unlawfully displayed at the event site.
901 “(f)(1) The caterer of the event may, within 10 days after the service of an order,
902 submit a written request to the Board for an expedited hearing on the alleged violation.
903 “(2) Upon receipt of a timely request for an expedited hearing, the Board
904 shall conduct a hearing within 10 days after the date of receiving the request and shall
905 deliver to the caterer of the event at the individual’s or owner’s last known address a
38

906 written notice of the hearing by any means guaranteed to be received at least 5 days
907 before the hearing date.
908 “(3) The Board shall issue a decision within 30 days after an expedited
909 hearing.
910 “(g) If a request for a hearing is not made under subsection (c) of this section, the
911 order of the Board shall be final.
912 “(h) If, after a hearing, the Board determines that the alleged violator is not in
913 violation of this title, the Board shall rescind the order.
914 “(i) If a person fails to comply with a lawful order of the Board under this section,
915 the Board may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for an order
916 compelling compliance or take any other action authorized by this subchapter.
917 “(j) The Board may lift or modify its order if the property owner demonstrates to
918 the satisfaction of the Board that it will take adequate steps to address the misuse of the
919 event site.”.
920 (4) Section 25-830 is amended as follows:
921 (A) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
922 “(a) The Board may submit amendments to the schedule of civil
923 penalties (“schedule”) for violations of this title to the Council for a 90-day period of
924 review, including Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and periods of Council recess. If the
925 Council does not approve, in whole or in part, the proposed regulations by resolution
926 within the 90-day period of review, the regulations shall be deemed approved. The
927 schedule, which shall be consistent with this title, shall replace all civil penalties, except
928 as expressly provided in this title.
39

929 (B) Paragraphs (e)(2) and (3) are repealed.
930 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
931 The Council adopts the fiscal impact in the committee report as the fiscal impact
932 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
933 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
934 Sec. 4. Effective date.
935 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
936 by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 60-day period of
937 congressional review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home
938 Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-
939 206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia Register.
40

For these reasons discussed above, I urge the Council to take prompt and favorable action on the
enclosed proposed bill.
Sincerely,
Muriel Bowser
Enclosure

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: August 11, 2025
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – DC Hospitality Amendment Act of 2026
Draft bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on June 6,
REFERENCE: 2025
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through the fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
The Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Board (the Board), through its direction of the Alcoholic
Beverage and Cannabis Administration (ABCA), oversees alcohol and medical cannabis laws in the
District. The bill makes numerous changes to the sale and use of alcohol in the District, including
adding new alcohol licensing categories and expanding how bars, restaurants, distilleries, wineries,
and breweries can serve patrons. Provisions of the bill include:
Outdoor Activation License: The bill creates a new license type to permit the sale and consumption
of alcohol in registered outdoor public spaces. It also provides that an Arena C/X licensee or a
Washington Convention and Sports Authority food and alcohol business that hosts sporting events
may request Board approval to allow the sale, service, and consumption of beer, wine, or spirits on
outdoor public space for a specific event that involves a street closure
Employment restrictions for returning citizens and individuals under 18: Under current law,
returning citizens with a felony conviction cannot be employed in some positions in alcohol-serving
establishments. The bill limits the prohibition on employment to within three years; and limits the
prohibition to certain felonies (crime of violence, gun offenses, tax evasion, fraud, or credit card
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Ward 5, Ward 7, Ward 8 and Downtown DC Hospitality Support Act of 2025,” Draft bill as provided to
the Office of Revenue Analysis on June 6, 2025
fraud). The bill would permit 17-year-olds who take an alcohol training course to serve alcoholic
beverages to individuals not seated at or standing at a bar, provided there is also a licensed manager
or owner onsite who is over 21 years of age. Currently, individuals under the age of 18 are not
permitted to sell or serve alcohol.
Partially consumed beverages: The bill would allow restaurant patrons to take an opened container
of alcohol with them when they leave. The allowance extends to taverns (as well as restaurants and
hotels) and covers malt beverages (as well as wine and beer).
New alcohol licensing types and license waivers: The bill permits restaurants to sell alcohol for on-
or off-premises consumption without requiring an accompanying food item. The bill also increases
the types of alcohol products that can be sold for on and off-premises consumption. The bill creates
new license types for contract brewing (between two breweries or brew pubs) and cross-distillery
collaborations (between two distilleries). It also expands the ability of alcohol manufacturers to
manufacture and store alcohol on or near their venue. The bill allows existing breweries to open a
new brewpub in Ward 5, Ward 7, Ward 8, or downtown. The bill also waives application licensing
fees for new art galleries for three years in Ward 5, Ward 7, Ward 8, and downtown.
Extended hours: The bill adds Juneteenth to the list of holidays for which alcohol sales can be
extended.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through the fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill. The Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Board and the Alcoholic Beverage and
Cannabis Administration can absorb any costs associated with the bill. ABCA will issue rulemaking
outlining the various fees for new license types and endorsements included in the bill.
Page 2 of 2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: June 6, 2025
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review – DC Hospitality Amendement Act of 2026
(AE-23-428 C)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
this Office has reviewed the above-referenced draft
legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this regard, please do
not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
2